Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1174.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3308, 4308 and 5308 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3308. Meetings.(a) Timing and notice.--The bylaws must require that meetings of the association be held at least once each year and provide for special meetings. The bylaws must specify which of the association's officers, not less than [ten nor more than 60] 21 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting, shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. 12345678910111213141516171819 Notice of any other meeting of the association may be provided by the association's officers not less than ten nor more than 60 days in advance of the meeting. The notice of a meeting may be delivered by electronic means if the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws permit electronic notices. The notice of any meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget or assessment changes and, where the declaration or bylaws require approval of unit owners, any proposal to remove an executive board member or officer. In the event of cancellation of an annual meeting of the unit owners' association at which directors are elected, the notice of a subsequent meeting scheduled to elect the directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.(b) Delivery of notice.--The bylaws must require that notice of virtual meetings of the association be given by:(1) First class or express mail, postage prepaid, or courier service, charges prepaid, to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to a unit owner when deposited in the United States mail or with a courier service for delivery to the unit owner and certified in writing by the appointed officer or an agent thereof as having been delivered.(2) Facsimile transmission, e-mail or other electronic communication to the unit owner's facsimile number or address for e-mail or other electronic communications supplied by the 20250HB1174PN1311 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unit owner, provided that the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws expressly permit means of delivering electronic notice. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to the unit owner when sent and certified in writing by the appointed officer or an agent thereof as having been sent.(c) Use of remote technology.--Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws, an individual may participate in a meeting of the executive board or association by means of a conference telephone or other remote electronic technology, including the Internet, which allows participants in the meeting to hear each other. Participation in a meeting as authorized under this subsection shall be deemed in-person attendance at the meeting.(d) Pre-election sessions.--The bylaws must require that, in the event that there are more candidates than open positions on the executive board, then, upon request of one or more of the candidates, the association shall hold a special session at least seven days before the election of an executive board member to allow the unit owners to meet each candidate for an executive board position. Each candidate for an executive board position shall have equal time to address the unit owners during a special session under this subsection.(e) Recorded meeting.--Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, [meetings] a meeting of the association required to be open under subsection (g) may be recorded by the executive board or any unit owner via audio or video technology, provided that an announcement is made by the presiding officer and any recording unit owner at the commencement of the meeting that the meeting will be recorded. A recorded meeting under this subsection shall 20250HB1174PN1311 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be maintained and available to unit owners for a period of no less than six months after the date of the meeting. The executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board conducting the meeting, may adopt rules governing the placement and use of equipment necessary for recording a meeting to prevent interference with the proceedings.(f) Executive board meetings.--(1) The executive board or a subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board, may convene in executive session to:(i) consider personnel matters;(ii) consult with legal counsel;(iii) discuss and consider contracts, probable or pending litigation and matters involving violations of the condominium instruments or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such condominium instruments for which a unit owner, the unit owner's family members, tenants, guests or other invitees are responsible; or(iv) discuss and consider the personal liability of unit owners to the unit owners' association upon the affirmative vote in an open meeting to assemble in executive session.(2) The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the executive session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the executive session shall be included in the minutes. The executive board shall restrict the consideration of matters during the executive session to only those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion.(3) No contract, motion or other action adopted, passed 20250HB1174PN1311 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or agreed to in executive session shall become effective unless the executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board following the executive session, reconvenes in open meeting and takes a vote on the contract, motion or other action, which shall have its substance reasonably identified in the open meeting.(4) The requirements of this subsection shall not be construed to require the disclosure of information in violation of law.(g) Executive board meeting access and notice.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, this subsection shall apply to an executive board meeting at which business of the unit owners' association is transacted or discussed. A meeting of the unit owners' association or the executive board, including a subcommittee or other committee of the association or board, shall be open to all unit owners of record. The executive board may not use a work session or other informal gathering of the executive board to circumvent the open meeting requirements of this section.(2) Notice of the time, date and place of a meeting of the executive board, or of a subcommittee or other committee of the executive board, and of each meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association, shall be published where it is reasonably calculated to be available to a majority of the unit owners.(3) A unit owner may make a request to be notified on a continual basis of any meeting, which request shall be made at least once a year in writing and include the unit owner's name, address, zip code and any email address, as 20250HB1174PN1311 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate. Notice of the time, date and place shall be sent to any unit owner requesting notice by first class mail, or email in the case of a meeting of the executive board, or by email in the case of a meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the executive board or of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association.(4) Notice, reasonable under the circumstances, of a special or emergency meeting shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the executive board or a subcommittee or other committee of the board or subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association conducting the meeting.(5) Voting by secret or written ballot in an open meeting is a violation of this section, except for the election of officers.(h) Unit owner comments.--(1) Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the executive board, the executive board shall provide a designated period during a meeting to allow unit owners an opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the unit owners' association.(2) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics, or at a special meeting, the executive board may limit the comments of unit owners to the topics listed on the meeting agenda.§ 4308. Meetings.(a) Timing and notice.--A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the executive board or by 20%, or any lower percentage specified in 20250HB1174PN1311 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the bylaws, of the proprietary lessees. Not less than [ten nor more than 60] 21 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the proprietary lessee. Notice of any other meeting shall be delivered by the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws not less than ten nor more than 60 days in advance of the meeting. The notice of a meeting may be delivered by electronic means if the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws permit electronic notices. The notice of any meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget or assessment changes and, where the declaration or bylaws require approval of the proprietary lessees, any proposal to remove an executive board member or officer. In the event of cancellation of an annual meeting of the association at which directors are elected, the notice of a subsequent meeting scheduled to elect the directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.(b) Delivery of notice.--The bylaws must require that notice of virtual meetings of the association be given by:(1) First class or express mail, postage prepaid, or courier service, charges prepaid, to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the proprietary lessee. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to a proprietary 20250HB1174PN1311 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lessee when deposited in the United States mail or with a courier service for delivery to the proprietary lessee and certified in writing by the secretary or an agent thereof as having been delivered.(2) Facsimile transmission, e-mail or other electronic communication to the proprietary lessee's facsimile number or address for e-mail or other electronic communications supplied by the proprietary lessee, provided that the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws expressly permit means of delivering electronic notice. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to the proprietary lessee when sent and certified in writing by the secretary or an agent thereof as having been sent.(c) Use of remote technology.--Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws, an individual may participate in a meeting of the executive board or association by means of a conference telephone or other remote electronic technology, including the Internet, which allows participants in the meeting to hear each other. Participation in a meeting as authorized under this subsection shall be deemed in-person attendance at the meeting.(d) Pre-election sessions.--The bylaws must require that, in the event that there are more candidates than open positions on the executive board, then, upon request of one or more of the candidates, the association shall hold a special session at least seven days prior to the election of an executive board member to allow the proprietary lessees to meet each candidate for an executive board position. Each candidate for an executive board position shall have equal time to address the proprietary lessees during a special session under this subsection.20250HB1174PN1311 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Recorded meeting.--Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, [meetings] a meeting of the association required to be open under subsection (g) may be recorded by the executive board or any proprietary lessee via audio or video technology, provided that an announcement is made by the presiding officer and any recording proprietary lessee at the commencement of the meeting that the meeting will be recorded. A recorded meeting under this subsection shall be maintained and available to proprietary lessees for a period of no less than six months after the date of the meeting. The executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board conducting the meeting, may adopt rules governing the placement and use of equipment necessary for recording a meeting to prevent interference with the proceedings.(f) Executive board meetings.--(1) The executive board or a subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board, may convene in executive session to:(i) consider personnel matters;(ii) consult with legal counsel;(iii) discuss and consider contracts, probable or pending litigation and matters involving violations of the cooperative instruments or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such cooperative instruments for which a proprietary lessee, the proprietary lessee's family members, tenants, guests or other invitees are responsible; or(iv) discuss and consider the personal liability of proprietary lessees to the association upon the affirmative vote in an open meeting to assemble in 20250HB1174PN1311 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive session.(2) The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the executive session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the executive session shall be included in the minutes. The executive board shall restrict the consideration of matters during the executive session to only those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion.(3) No contract, motion or other action adopted, passed or agreed to in executive session shall become effective unless the executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board following the executive session, reconvenes in open meeting and takes a vote on the contract, motion or other action, which shall have its substance reasonably identified in the open meeting.(4) The requirements of this subsection shall not be construed to require the disclosure of information in violation of law.(g) Executive board meeting access and notice.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in the cooperative instruments, the provisions of this subsection shall apply to executive board meetings at which business of the association is transacted or discussed. All meetings of the association or the executive board, including a subcommittee or other committee of the association or board, shall be open to all proprietary lessees of record. The executive board may not use a work session or other informal gathering of the executive board to circumvent the open meeting requirements of this section.(2) Notice of the time, date and place of a meeting of the executive board, or of a subcommittee or other committee 20250HB1174PN1311 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the executive board, and of each meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the association, shall be published where it is reasonably calculated to be available to a majority of the unit proprietary lessees.(3) A proprietary lessee may make a request to be notified on a continual basis of any meeting, which request shall be made at least once a year in writing and include the proprietary lessee's name, address, zip code and any email address, as appropriate. Notice of the time, date and place shall be sent to a proprietary lessee requesting notice by first class mail, or email in the case of a meeting of the executive board, or by email in the case of a meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the executive board or of a subcommittee or other committee of the association.(4) Notice, reasonable under the circumstances, of a special or emergency meeting shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the executive board or a subcommittee or other committee of the board or subcommittee or other committee of the association conducting the meeting.(5) Voting by secret or written ballot in an open meeting is a violation of this section, except for the election of officers.(h) Proprietary lessee comments.--(1) Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the executive board, the executive board shall provide a designated period during a meeting to allow proprietary lessees an opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the association.(2) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics, or at a special meeting, the executive board 20250HB1174PN1311 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may limit the comments of proprietary lessees to the topics listed on the meeting agenda.§ 5308. Meetings.(a) Timing and notice.--The bylaws shall require that meetings of the association be held at least once each year and shall provide for special meetings. The bylaws shall specify which of the association's officers, not less than [ten nor more than 60] 21 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting, shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. Notice of any other meeting shall be delivered in this manner by the association's officers not less than ten nor more than 60 days in advance of the meeting. The notice of a meeting may be delivered by electronic means if the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws permit electronic notices. The notice of any meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws; any budget or assessment changes; and, where the declaration or bylaws require approval of unit owners, any proposal to remove a director or officer. In the event of cancellation of an annual meeting of the unit owners' association at which directors are elected, the notice of a subsequent meeting scheduled to elect the directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.(b) Delivery of notice.--The bylaws must require that notice of virtual meetings of the association be given by:(1) First class or express mail, postage prepaid, or 20250HB1174PN1311 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 courier service, charges prepaid, to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to a unit owner when deposited in the United States mail or with a courier service for delivery to the unit owner and certified in writing by the appointed officer or an agent thereof as having been delivered.(2) Facsimile transmission, e-mail or other electronic communication to the unit owner's facsimile number or address for e-mail or other electronic communications supplied by the unit owner, provided that the unit owner has agreed in writing to accept the notice by electronic means or where the bylaws expressly permit means of delivering electronic notice. Notice under this paragraph shall be deemed to have been given to the unit owner when sent and certified in writing by the appointed officer or an agent thereof as having been sent.(c) Use of remote technology.--Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws, an individual may participate in a meeting of the executive board or association by means of a conference telephone or other remote electronic technology, including the Internet, which allows each participant in the meeting to hear each other. Participation in a meeting as authorized under this subsection shall be deemed in-person attendance at the meeting.(d) Pre-election sessions.--The bylaws must require that, in the event that there are more candidates than open positions on the executive board, then, upon request of one or more of the candidates, the association shall hold a special session at least seven days before the election of an executive board 20250HB1174PN1311 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 member to allow the unit owners to meet each candidate for an executive board position. Each candidate for an executive board position shall have equal time to address the unit owners during a special session under this subsection.(e) Recorded meeting.--Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, [meetings] a meeting of the association required to be open under subsection (g) may be recorded by the executive board or any unit owner via audio or video technology, provided that an announcement is made by the presiding officer and any recording unit owner at the commencement of the meeting that the meeting will be recorded. A recorded meeting under this subsection shall be maintained and available to unit owners for a period of no less than six months after the date of the meeting. The executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board conducting the meeting, may adopt rules governing the placement and use of equipment necessary for recording a meeting to prevent interference with the proceedings.(f) Executive board meetings.--(1) The executive board or a subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board, may convene in executive session to:(i) consider personnel matters;(ii) consult with legal counsel;(iii) discuss and consider contracts, probable or pending litigation and matters involving violations of the community instruments or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such community instruments for which a unit owner, the unit owner's family members, tenants, guests or other invitees are responsible; or20250HB1174PN1311 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) discuss and consider the personal liability of unit owners to the unit owners' association upon the affirmative vote in an open meeting to assemble in executive session.(2) The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the executive session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the executive session shall be included in the minutes. The executive board shall restrict the consideration of matters during the executive session to only those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion.(3) No contract, motion or other action adopted, passed or agreed to in executive session shall become effective unless the executive board or subcommittee, or other committee of the executive board following the executive session, reconvenes in open meeting and takes a vote on the contract, motion or other action, which shall have its substance reasonably identified in the open meeting.(4) The requirements of this subsection shall not be construed to require the disclosure of information in violation of law.(g) Executive board meeting access and notice.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in the community instruments, this subsection shall apply to an executive board meeting at which business of the unit owners' association is transacted or discussed. A meeting of the unit owners' association or the executive board, including a subcommittee or other committee of the association or board, shall be open to all unit owners of record. The executive board may not use a work session or other informal gathering of the executive board to circumvent the open meeting 20250HB1174PN1311 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this section.(2) Notice of the time, date and place of a meeting of the executive board, or of a subcommittee or other committee of the executive board, and of each meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association, shall be published where it is reasonably calculated to be available to a majority of the unit owners.(3) A unit owner may make a request to be notified on a continual basis of any meeting, which request shall be made at least once a year in writing and include the unit owner's name, address, zip code and any email address, as appropriate. Notice of the time, date and place shall be sent to any unit owner requesting notice by first class mail, or email in the case of a meeting of the executive board, or by email in the case of a meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the executive board or of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association.(4) Notice, reasonable under the circumstances, of a special or emergency meeting shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the executive board or a subcommittee or other committee of the board or subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners' association conducting the meeting.(5) Voting by secret or written ballot in an open meeting is a violation of this section, except for the election of officers.(h) Unit owner comments.--(1) Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the executive board, the executive board shall provide a designated period during a meeting to allow unit owners an opportunity to 20250HB1174PN1311 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 comment on any matter relating to the unit owners' association.(2) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics, or at a special meeting, the executive board may limit the comments of unit owners to the topics listed on the meeting agenda.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1174PN1311 - 17 - 1234567